srcV2/esu.lexc
LEXICON NounPostbase
NounInflection;
VerbEte;
-–ngqerr[N→V]:%<+(r)                            SubordinativeVerbInflection; ! to have N
!-–ar[N→N]:%<–ar                                 NounPostbase; ! (usually does not alter meaning of noun base)
!-–kellriig[N→N]:%<–kellriig                     NounPostbase; ! the pair or group whereof one member has the other as his N
!-–kellriit[N→N]:%<–kellriit                     NounPostbase; ! the pair or group whereof one member has the other as his N
!-%:(e)nkut[N→N]:%<%:(e)nkut                     EncliticOrEnd; ! (plural) N and family; N and companion
!-%:(e)nkuk[N→N]:%<%:(e)nkuk                     EncliticOrEnd; ! (dual) N and family; N and companion
!-@vag/?vag[N→N]:%<@vag/?vag                     NounPostbase; ! big N; large N

-–ar(ar*)[N→N]:%<–ar(ar*)                      NounPostbase; ! little piece of N
-–cengar*[N→N]:%<–cengar*                      NounPostbase; ! one with a small N
-–ciller[N→N]:%<–ciller                        NounPostbase; ! worthless N; dilapidated N
-–cuar(ar*)[N→N]:%<–cuar(ar*)                  NounPostbase; ! small N; tiny N; little N
-–cug[N→N]:%<–cug                              NounPostbase; ! unpleasing N; ugly old N
-–cungar[N→N]:%<–cungar                        NounPostbase; ! cute little N; little N
-%:(ng)inar*[N→N]:%<%:(ng)inar*                NounPostbase; ! merely N (nothing more)
-–irite[N→N]:%<–irite                          NounPostbase; ! forms names of weekdays from certain noun bases
-%:(ng)i%:rute[N→N]:%<%:(ng)i%:rute            NounPostbase; ! late (deceased) N; something that causes one to lose his N
-–kainer[N→N]:%<–kainer                        NounPostbase; ! a little bit of N; small amount of N
-+kar[N→N]:%<+kar                              NounPostbase; ! raw material for N; future N; unrealized N
-@kar(ar*)¹[N→N]:%<@⁵kar(ar*)                  NounPostbase; ! small N; little N
-–kcag[N→N]:%<–kcag                            NounPostbase; ! something that looks like N
-–kcuar(ar*)[N→N]:%<–kcuar(ar*)                NounPostbase; ! small N; little N
-–kegtaar(ar*)[N→N]:%<–k̲egtaar(ar*)           NounPostbase; ! good N; nice N; new N
-–kegtaar(ar*)[N→N]:%<–kegtaar(ar*)            NounPostbase; ! good N; nice N; new N
-@–ksagar[N→N]:%<@⁵–ksagar                     NounPostbase; ! very ugly N
-@ksuar(ar*)[N→N]:%<@⁵ksuar(ar*)               NounPostbase; ! small N
-+kuar[N→N]:%<+kuar                            NounPostbase; ! leftover N
-–kucir[N→N]:%<–kucir                          NounPostbase; ! one of the same kind as N
-–kucir[N→N]:%<–kucir                          NounPostbase; ! one of the same kind as N
-–kuiner(ar*)[N→N]:%<–kuiner(ar*)              NounPostbase; ! small amount of N
-–kuinr(ar*)[N→N]:%<–kuinr(ar*)                NounPostbase; ! small amount of N
-–kuiner[N→N]:%<–kuiner                        NounPostbase; ! small amount of N
-–kutar[N→N]:%<–k̲utar                         NounPostbase; ! thing to be used as N would be used; small N
-–kute[N→N]:%<–kute                            NounPostbase; ! thing to be used as N would be used; small N
-–kuyug[N→N]:%<–kuyug                          NounPostbase; ! small bit of N; poor N
-–kuyugar[N→N]:%<–kuyugar                      NounPostbase; ! small bit of N; poor N
-–leg[N→N]:%<–leg                              NounPostbase; ! one with N or Ns, one having N
-–lgute[N→N]:%<–lgute                          NounPostbase; ! one who has the same N as possessor; sharer of N
-+li¹[N→N]:%<+li                               NounPostbase; ! one similar to N
-+lir[N→N]:%<+lir                              NounPostbase; ! one similar to N
-––liar[N→N]:%<––liar                          NounPostbase; ! a made N; N made by possessor
-––linrar*[N→N]:%<––linrar*                    NounPostbase; ! product of N; evidence or trace of N
-––linr(ar*)[N→N]:%<––linr(ar*)                NounPostbase; ! product of N; evidence or trace of N
-–lirner[N→N]:%<–lirner                        NounPostbase; ! area in the N direction; one of the N direction
-–lkug[N→N]:%<–lkug                            NounPostbase; ! no-good, darned N
-–llar*[N→N]:%<–llar*                          NounPostbase; ! thing of N (often with reference to the past)
-–ller¹[N→N]:%<–ller                           NounPostbase; ! former N
-–ller(ar*)[N→N]:%<–ller(ar*)                  NounPostbase; ! shabby, old N
-–llruar(ar*)[N→N]:%<–llruar(ar*)              NounPostbase; ! few N in poor condition
-@–llug[N→N]:%<@⁵–llug                         NounPostbase; ! bad N; one with bad N
-–lqur[N→N]:%<–lqur                            NounPostbase; ! old broken piece of N
-–luatar[N→N]:%<–luatar                        NounPostbase; ! good N
-–lugpiar[N→N]:%<–lugpiar                      NounPostbase; ! original N; authentic N
-–maa[N→N]:%<–maa                              NounPostbase; ! my N, ... ; my Ns, ...
-+mig[N→N]:%<+mig                              NounPostbase; ! thing held in one's N
-+miar[N→N]:%<+miar                            NounPostbase; ! thing held in one's N
-~+miu[N→N]:%<~+miu                            NounPostbase; ! inhabitant of N; resident of N; tribe-member of or from N
-~+miutar*[N→N]:%<~+miutar*                    NounPostbase; ! one whose place is N
-–mte[N→N]:%<–mte                              NounPostbase; ! our N, ... ; our Ns, ...
-+ner⁴[N→N]:%<+ner                             NounPostbase; ! area of N
-–nerrar*[N→N]:%<–nerrar*                      NounPostbase; ! new N
-–nerrar(ar*)[N→N]:%<–nerrar(ar*)              NounPostbase; ! new N
-–nerar(ar*)[N→N]:%<–nerar(ar*)                NounPostbase; ! new N
-–ngirta'rrlugar*[N→N]:%<–ngirta'rrlugar*      NounPostbase; ! good old (but perhaps decrepit) N
-–ngnagar[N→N]:%<–ngnagar                      NounPostbase; ! poor quality N; darned N
-–ngssaar(ar*)[N→N]:%<–ngssaar(ar*)            NounPostbase; ! secret N
-–nguar[N→N]:%<–nguar                          NounPostbase; ! imitation N; inauthentic N; thing similar to or reminiscent of N
-–ngyaar(ar*)[N→N]:%<–ngyaar(ar*)              NounPostbase; ! old N (person)
-–ngiar(ar*)[N→N]:%<–ngiar(ar*)                NounPostbase; ! old N (person)
-+nir¹[N→N]:%<+nir                             NounPostbase; ! since N; since some time in the N
-+nir²[N→N]:%<+nir                             NounPostbase; ! the smell of N
-–paarrlug[N→N]:%<–paarrlug                    NounPostbase; ! big N
-–pig¹[N→N]:%<–pig                             NounPostbase; ! genuine N; real N; authentic N
-–piar[N→N]:%<–piar                            NounPostbase; ! genuine N; real N; authentic N
-–pigar[N→N]:%<–pigar                          NounPostbase; ! genuine N; real N; authentic N
-=+r[N→N]:%<=r                                 NounPostbase; ! used to connect English nouns to Yup'ik noun endings
-=+(a)r[N→N]:%<=ar                             NounPostbase; ! used to connect English nouns to Yup'ik noun endings
-=+(aa)r[N→N]:%<=aar                           NounPostbase; ! used to connect English nouns to Yup'ik noun endings
-–qainar[N→N]:%<–q̲ainar                       NounPostbase; ! only N; merely N
-+qar[N→N]:%<+qar                              NounPostbase; ! N area of possessor; exact area denoted by N with respect to possessor
-–qlikacaar(ar*)[N→N]:%<–q̲likacaar(ar*)       NounPostbase; ! one that is the farthest in the area denoted by N
-–qlikacaar(ar*)[N→N]:%<–q̲likacaar(ar*)       NounPostbase; ! one that is the farthest in the area denoted by N
-–qlikacaar(ar*)[N→N]:%<–q̲likacaar(ar*)       NounPostbase; ! one that is the farthest in the area denoted by N
-–qlir*[N→N]:%<–q̲lir*                         NounPostbase; ! the one located far in the area or space or time denoted by N
-–qlir*[N→N]:%<–q̲lir*                         NounPostbase; ! the one located far in the area or space or time denoted by N
-–qlir*[N→N]:%<–q̲lir*                         NounPostbase; ! the one located far in the area or space or time denoted by N

LEXICON ProperNoun
Iquarmiut                                      NounPostbase; ! Ohogamiut
Pugnguaryaraq:Pugnguaryarar                    NounPostbase; ! old-time Yup'ik holiday celebrated shortly before the “Nakaciuryaraq” (“Bladder Feast”)
LEXICON NounBase
aaqcurliq:aaqcurlir                            NounPostbase; ! robin (Turdus migratorius)
agtuirtelleq:agtuirteller                      NounPostbase; ! break in the bluffs
akulmiqurataak:akulmiqurataag                  NounPostbase; ! two-pointed bird-hunting arrow
alunaq:alunar                                  NounPostbase; ! tiller; sled handlebar; steering wheel; tail feather of bird
angayuqaq*:angayuqar*                          NounPostbase; ! boss; chief; parent
anuk:anug                                      NounPostbase; ! dog harness
arnangiar(aq*):arnangiar(ar*)                  NounPostbase; ! middle-aged or old woman
atkucuar(aq*):atkucuar(ar*)                    NounPostbase; ! shirt
ayugesvik:ayugesvig                            NounPostbase; ! bearded seal (Erignathus barbatus) with red head
capuraun:capuraute                             NounPostbase; ! diaphragm (anatomical)
cetamain:cetamai                               NounPostbase; ! four groups or pairs or bundles
cill'aq:cill'ar                                NounPostbase; ! circular calendar with a pointer that is moved to point to the days of the week
civigniq*:civignir*                            NounPostbase; ! yellow thing
curavak:curavag                                NounPostbase; ! type of large blueberry (Vaccinium sp. ); huckleberry (local name)
eliqneq:eliqner                                NounPostbase; ! scrap or remnant leftover when something has been cut out
enluqvagaq:enluqvagar                          NounPostbase; ! small house
evsaik:evsaig                                  NounPostbase; ! female breast
ikuyek:ikuyeg                                  NounPostbase; ! elbow
ingciraun:ingciraute                           NounPostbase; ! ivory-engraving knife or other such tool; graver
ircaquruaq:ircaquruar                          NounPostbase; ! heart-shaped sea ice formation
kakek:kakeg                                    NounPostbase; ! nasal mucus; snot
kangqiiq:kangqiir                              NounPostbase; ! ptarmigan (Lagopus sp.)
kavya                                          NounPostbase; ! granularity (?) of sand
kemeqliq*:kemeqlir*                            NounPostbase; ! shirt; undershirt
kiiyaq:kiiyar                                  NounPostbase; ! men's community house; kashim
kumarcissuun:kumarcissuute                     NounPostbase; ! cigarette lighter; fire-starting device such as bow-drill; fire-drill
maqaruaq:maqaruar                              NounPostbase; ! snowshoe hare; varying hare (Lepus americanus); locally rabbit
nagtuqaq:nagtuqar                              NounPostbase; ! belt buckle; clasp fastener
nemernaq:nemernar                              NounPostbase; ! root of plant; lamprey (Lampetra japonica)
nuyiurun:nuyiurute                             NounPostbase; ! comb; brush
piitnaq:piitnar                                NounPostbase; ! famine
qallin:qallite                                 NounPostbase; ! stomach fat of ground squirrel
qecigpak:qecigpag                              NounPostbase; ! walrus (Odobenus rosmarus)
qipalluraq:qipallurar                          NounPostbase; ! inner canthus (inner corner of eye around tear duct)
saskuk:saskug                                  NounPostbase; ! implement; tool; weapon
taqikartuliq:taqikartulir                      NounPostbase; ! slough with lake at end
tugrinaq:tugrinar                              NounPostbase; ! “Eskimo ice cream” made with sourdock
ui                                             NounPostbase; ! husband
uqsurpayagaq:uqsurpayagar                      NounPostbase; ! nickel; five cents
yuguaq:yuguar                                  NounPostbase; ! ball; human or human-like figure; doll; figurine
